Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5324XS (2) 91 da/js S.F. 2180 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 191.9A Food products containing 1 a vaccine. 2 1. As used in this section, âvaccine or vaccine materialâ 3 means a substance intended for use in humans to stimulate 4 the production of antibodies and provide immunity against 5 disease, if prepared from the causative agent of a disease, its 6 products, or a synthetic substitute, and treated to act as an 7 antigen without inducing the disease. 8 2. A person shall not directly or indirectly offer for sale 9 or sell food processed for human consumption if all of the 10 following apply: 11 a. The foodâs ingredients include a vaccine or vaccine 12 material that has been approved by the United States food and 13 drug administration. 14 b. The foodâs packaging or wrapping is not attached with 15 a conspicuous label that notifies persons the food contains a 16 vaccine or vaccine material. 17